Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.362

1939 conveyance of shorelands to university—Deed of conveyance.

The governor is hereby authorized and directed to execute, and the secretary of state to attest, a deed conveying to the University of Washington all of said shorelands.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.362. Prior: 1939 c 60 s 2; No RRS. Formerly RCW 28.77.335.]